Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-408 Annual report filed by
association. The association shall submit an annual report to the
commissioner which shall become public information and shall include the
following:

(1) The number of persons insured;

(2) The names of the insurers participating in the
association with respect to insurance offered under this part;

(3) The calendar year experience applicable to such
insurance offered under this part. Item (3) shall include:

(A) Premiums earned,

(B) Claims paid during the calendar year,

(C) The amount of claims reserve established,

(D) Administrative expenses,

(E) Commissions,

(F) Promotional expenses,

(G) Taxes,

(H) Contingency reserve,

(I) Other expenses, and

(J) Profit and loss for the year.

The commissioner shall require the association
to provide any and all information concerning the operations of the association
deemed relevant by the commissioner for inclusion in the report. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next